Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.39
Training program manager, defined.

Training program manager means the individual responsible for administering an accredited training program and monitoring the performance of principal instructors and guest instructors.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 41.